Wyoming, session 2026, HB0051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-6-130 by creating a new subsection
(c) is amended to read:

22-6-130. Post-election ballot audit.

(c) In addition to the audit under subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, following each primary and general
election, each county clerk shall conduct an audit of the
ballots in one (1) precinct as provided in this subsection.
HB0051

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0043
The secretary of state shall randomly select one (1)
precinct in each county to be audited as provided in this
subsection. The county clerk shall conduct a hand count
audit of all ballots cast in the precinct selected by the
secretary of state and shall compare the hand count result
to the result tabulated by the electronic voting system.
The audit under this subsection shall be completed not
later than one (1) week after the date of the election. The
results of the audit and the comparison shall immediately
be reported to the secretary of state. The secretary of
state shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
subsection, including rules establishing the scope of the
audit and the procedures for conducting the audit under
this subsection.

Section 2. The secretary of state shall adopt rules
regarding the hand count audit required under W.S.
22-6-130(c), as created by section 1 of this act, not later
than July 1, 2026.

HB0051

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0043
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0051